apertium-cy-en.cy.dix.xml
    <pardef n="ailgyn/nig__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nig</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igia</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igied</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiwn</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiwch</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igient</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igier</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiwn</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igit</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiai</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiem</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiech</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igient</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igid</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiais</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiaist</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiodd</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiasom</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiasoch</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiasant</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiwyd</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiaswn</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiasit</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiasai</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiasem</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiasech</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiasent</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiasid</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiaf</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igi</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igia</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiwn</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiwch</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiant</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igir</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiwyf</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiech</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igio</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiom</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igioch</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igiont</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igier</l>
          <r>nig<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ailgynnig"><i>ailgyn</i><par n="ailgyn/nig__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cynnig"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yn</i><par n="ailgyn/nig__vblex"/></e>
